Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3417
Attorney in fact; powers and duties; exceptions; responsibility for costs; rights; objection of principal; health care provider; acceptance of decisions.

(1) When the authority conferred by a power of attorney for health care has commenced, the attorney in fact, subject to any instructions and limitations set forth in the power of attorney for health care or elsewhere, shall make health care decisions on the principal's behalf, except that the attorney in fact shall not have authority (a) to consent to any act or omission to which the principal could not consent under law, (b) to make any decision when the principal is known to be pregnant that will result in the death of the principal's unborn child and it is probable that the unborn child will develop to the point of live birth with continued application of health care, or (c) to make decisions regarding withholding or withdrawing a life-sustaining procedure or withholding or withdrawing artificially administered nutrition and hydration except as provided under section 30-3418.

(2) The attorney in fact shall have priority over any person other than the principal to act for the principal in all health care decisions, except that the attorney in fact shall not have the authority to make any health care decision unless and until the principal has been determined to be incapable of making health care decisions pursuant to section 30-3412.

(3) The attorney in fact shall not be personally responsible for the cost of health care provided to the principal.

(4) Except to the extent that the right is limited by the power of attorney for health care, an attorney in fact shall have the same right as the principal to receive information regarding the proposed health care, to receive and review medical and clinical records, and to consent to the disclosures of such records, except that the right to access such records shall not be a waiver of any evidentiary privilege.

(5) Notwithstanding a determination pursuant to section 30-3412 that the principal is incapable of making health care decisions, when a principal objects to the determination or to a health care decision made by an attorney in fact, the principal's objection or decision shall prevail unless the principal is determined by a county court to be incapable of making health care decisions.

(6) No health care provider shall be required to accept health care decisions from an attorney in fact until such health care provider has received a signed original or a photostatic copy of a signed original power of attorney for health care.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 17.